Montana, session 2025, HB611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 2-16-405, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-16-405. Salaries of certain elected state officials. (1) The salaries paid to the following elected
officials are determined as provided in subsection (2):
(a) governor;
(b) lieutenant governor;
(c) attorney general;
(d) state auditor, ex officio commissioner of insurance and securities;
(e) superintendent of public instruction;
(f) public service commission presiding officer;
(g) public service commissioners, other than presiding officer;
(h) secretary of state;
(i) clerk of the supreme court.
(2) Before June 30 of each even-numbered year, the department of administration shall conduct a
salary survey of executive branch officials with similar titles to the Montana officials listed in subsection (1) for
the states of North Dakota, South Dakota, Wyoming, and Idaho. The department shall include the salary for the
Montana official in determining the average salary for the officials with similar titles. If the average salary is
greater than the salary for the official in Montana, then beginning July 1 of the year following the year in which
the survey is conducted, the average salary is the new salary for the official."
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 611
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 611
Section 2. Applicability. [This act] applies to the state auditor beginning January 1, 2028.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 611
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 611, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 611
INTRODUCED BY S. DEMAROIS, J. REAVIS, J. ISALY, P. STRAND, J. WEBER, J. SOOKTIS, A. GRIFFITH,
F. SMITH, M. FOX, D. HARVEY, D. BAUM, M. CAFERRO, T. FRANCE, M. ROMANO, E. STAFMAN, D. JOY,
J. LYNCH
AN ACT REVISING THE SALARY OF THE STATE AUDITOR; CLARIFYING THAT THE STATE AUDITOR IS
ALSO THE EX OFFICIO COMMISSIONER OF INSURANCE AND SECURITIES; AMENDING SECTION 2-16-
405, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN APPLICABILITY DATE.”